New York, session 2025-2026, A9543.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the term "blockchain technol- 2 ogy" shall mean distributed ledger technologies, including public, 3 permissioned, and hybrid systems, as well as smart contracts and other 4 forms of programmable logic. Such term shall also include the tokeniza- 5 tion of data or assets, where applicable. 6 § 2. The chief information officer shall, in consultation with any 7 other department, division, board, bureau, commission, agency, or public 8 authority of the state or any political subdivision thereof deemed 9 necessary by the officer, prepare a study to evaluate the feasibility, 10 potential benefits, risk, and costs of adopting the use of blockchain 11 technology for use within the state government. Such study shall 12 include, but not be limited to: 13 (a) an evaluation of blockchain technology's potential application for 14 records management and public archives; interagency data-sharing and 15 case management; cybersecurity and system integrity; asset and supply 16 chain management; judicial and criminal justice system applications; 17 non-voting election-related applications; verification of licensing and 18 credentialing processes relating to professional licenses; workforce and 19 organizational readiness; interoperability and standards for blockchain 20 with current state information technology systems; data governance and 21 ethics; and any other potential state application for secure data 22 management; and 23 (b) a cost-benefit analysis of the implementation of blockchain tech- 24 nology; technical, technological, legal, regulatory, privacy, and 25 cybersecurity considerations; and recommendations regarding the use of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14300-01-5 A. 9543 2 1 blockchain technology by state agencies, along with legislative and 2 regulatory proposals necessary to implement such regulations. 3 § 3. The chief information officer shall publish a report of the 4 study's findings to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, 5 the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the senate, and the 6 minority leader of the assembly on or before twelve months after the 7 effective date of this act. 8 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 9 deemed repealed twelve months after such date.